New York, session 2025-2026, A8241.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "tariff transparency act". 3 § 2. Legislative intent. The purpose of this act is to ensure that New 4 York consumers are informed about the impact of federal tariffs on the 5 price of automobiles. 6 § 3. Section 471 of the vehicle and traffic law, as added by chapter 7 521 of the laws of 1992, is amended to read as follows: 8 § 471. Notice requirement. 1. As used in this section, the following 9 terms shall have the following meanings: 10 (a) "Monroney label" means the label that automobile manufacturers are 11 required by the federal Automobile Information Disclosure Act of 1968 to 12 affix to the window of any new car delivered to a dealer, which includes 13 price information for the car. 14 (b) "Tariff cost estimate" means an estimate of any increase in the 15 price or prices listed on the Monroney label resulting directly or indi- 16 rectly from tariffs imposed by the federal government, including but not 17 limited to, tariffs on steel, aluminum, and other goods used in the 18 manufacturing, assembly, or distribution of automobiles. Such estimate 19 shall include all increases in price attributable to the tariffs. 20 2. A dealer shall not display for sale, exchange or sell any new motor 21 vehicle, or any used motor vehicle, that was originally sold by a 22 manufacturer for distribution outside the United States without promi- 23 nently displaying a label on the vehicle stating that "This vehicle was 24 not sold by the manufacturer for distribution within the United States. 25 It may not have the same standard features, emissions equipment, safety EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11859-02-5 A. 8241 2 1 equipment, optional equipment, specifications and warranty, or otherwise 2 be identical to the other motor vehicles which are sold by the manufac- 3 turer for distribution in the United States". 4 3. Any manufacturer that ships a new car to a dealer in the state of 5 New York after the effective date of the chapter of the laws of two 6 thousand twenty-five that amended this section shall affix to the car 7 window a label presenting the tariff cost estimate. The tariff cost 8 estimate shall be presented in a clear, conspicuous, and easily under- 9 standable manner to the consumer. This requirement may be satisfied by 10 inclusion of the tariff cost estimate on the Monroney label. 11 [2.] 4. Any person who violates this section and any person who know- 12 ingly aids and abets any such violation of this section shall be liable 13 to any person aggrieved to the extent of any additional margin obtained 14 or obtainable on such purchase and resale. 15 § 4. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 16 have become a law.